Oklahoma, session 2026, SB648.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 82 O.S. 2021, Section 1605, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1605. A. 1. A county floodplain board shall be


composed of five (5) members to be appointed by the board of county


commissioners.


2. All the members of the board shall be residents of the


county and shall own or operate real property within the


unincorporated area of the county.


3. Two members shall be appointed for terms of two (2) years,


two members shall be appointed for terms of four (4) years and one



Req. No. 841 Page 1


member shall be appointed for a term of six (6) years. Thereafter,


all appointments shall be made for terms of six (6) years.


4. All members shall serve without may receive as compensation


an amount to be established by the board of county commissioners not


to exceed One Hundred Twenty-five Dollars ($125.00) per meeting.


The members may be reimbursed expenses incurred in performance of


their duties as provided in the State Travel Reimbursement Act.


Members may be removed by the board of county commissioners for


cause after a public hearing for that purpose.


5. Vacancies shall be filled by additional appointments for the


unexpired term only.


B. 1. A municipal floodplain board shall be composed of five


(5) members to be appointed by the municipal governing body. All


the members of the board shall be residents of the municipality.


2. Membership of floodplain boards in existence prior to the


effective date of this act May 13, 1980, shall remain as currently


constituted. Membership for boards created subsequent to the


effective date of this act May 13, 1980, shall consist of two


members appointed for terms of two (2) years, two members appointed


for terms of four (4) years and one member appointed for a term of


six (6) years. Thereafter, all appointments shall be made for terms


of six (6) years.


3. All members shall serve without compensation may receive as


compensation an amount to be established by the municipal governing

Req. No. 841 Page 2


body not to exceed One Hundred Twenty-five Dollars ($125.00) per


meeting. The members may be reimbursed expenses incurred in


performance of their duties as provided in the State Travel


Reimbursement Act.


4. Members may be removed by the municipal governing body for


cause after a public hearing for that purpose.


5. Vacancies shall be filled by additional appointments for the


unexpired term only.


C. A state floodplain board shall be composed of the members of


the Oklahoma Water Resources Board. All members shall serve without


additional compensation.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-841 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:40:40 AM





















Req. No. 841 Page 3